Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8614
Hearing authorized.

The commission shall provide an opportunity for a fair hearing to any person applying for or receiving services who is dissatisfied with any action or failure to act arising from the operation or administration of any service or program authorized under the Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired Act.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 14.